Washington statutes.
RCW 32.08.130

Reimbursement fund.

When the portion of the guaranty fund created from earnings amounts to not less than five thousand dollars (including in the case of a savings bank converted from a building and loan or savings and loan association or society the amount of the initial guaranty fund), the board of trustees, with the written consent of the director, may establish a reimbursement fund from which to repay contributors to the expense fund and the initial guaranty fund (excepting the initial guaranty fund in the case of a bank converted from a building and loan or savings and loan association or society), and may transfer to the reimbursement fund any unexpended balance of contributions to the expense fund. At the close of each dividend period the trustees may place to the credit of the reimbursement fund not more than one percent of the net earnings of the bank during that period. Payments from the reimbursement fund may be made from time to time in such amounts as the board of trustees shall determine, and shall be made first to the contributors to the expense fund in proportion to their contributions thereto until they shall have been repaid in full, and then shall be made to the contributors to the guaranty fund in proportion to their contributions thereto until they shall have been repaid in full. In case of the liquidation of the savings bank before the contributions to the expense fund and the initial guaranty fund have been fully repaid as above contemplated, any portion of the contributions not needed for the payment of the expenses of liquidation and the payment of depositors in full shall be paid to the contributors to the expense fund in proportion to their contributions thereto until they have been repaid in full, and then shall be paid to the contributors to the guaranty fund in proportion to their contributions thereto until they have been repaid in full.

[ 1994 c 92 s 318; 1955 c 13 s 32.08.130. Prior: 1945 c 135 s 1; 1927 c 178 s 1; 1915 c 175 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3321.]